Utah statutes.
26-3-5.   Coordination of health data collection activities.

(1)  The department shall coordinate health data activities within the state to eliminate unnecessary duplication of data collection and maximize the usefulness of data collected.

(2)  Except as specifically provided, this chapter does not independently provide authority for the department to compel the reporting of information.

